Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-1207
Costs of elections; certification; payment; when due.

The election commissioner or county clerk shall fix and certify the cost of elections pursuant to sections 32-1203 to 32-1206. The cost of elections shall be due and payable from each political subdivision within thirty days after the receipt of the statement certifying the cost of the election. All payments received by the election commissioner or county clerk from each political subdivision for the cost of elections shall be placed in the county general fund and shall be used to help defray the cost of elections.

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 372.